Washington statutes.
RCW 11.108.020

Marital deduction gift—Compliance with Internal Revenue Code—Fiduciary powers.

(1) If a governing instrument contains a marital deduction gift, the governing instrument shall be construed to comply with the marital deduction provisions of the Internal Revenue Code in every respect.

(2) If a governing instrument contains a marital deduction gift, any fiduciary operating under the governing instrument has all the powers, duties, and discretionary authority necessary to comply with the marital deduction provisions of the Internal Revenue Code. The fiduciary shall not take any action or have any power that may impair that deduction, but this does not require the fiduciary to make the elections under either section 2056(b)(7) or 2523(f) of the Internal Revenue Code that is referred to in RCW 11.108.025.

[ 1997 c 252 s 82; 1993 c 73 s 3; 1988 c 64 s 28; 1985 c 30 s 107. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 141.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.